California statutes. Civil Code
(k) (1) A person may not maintain a cause of action pursuant to this section against any entity required to comply with any independent medical review system or independent review system required by law unless the person or his or her representative has exhausted the procedures provided by the applicable independent review system.

(2) Compliance with paragraph (1) is not required in a case where either of the following applies:

(A) Substantial harm, as defined in subdivision (b), has occurred prior to the completion of the applicable review.

(B) Substantial harm, as defined, in subdivision (b), will imminently occur prior to the completion of the applicable review.

(3) This subdivision shall become operative only if Senate Bill 189 and Assembly Bill 55 of the 1999–2000 Regular Session are also enacted and enforceable.

(l) If any provision of this section or the application thereof to any person or circumstance is held to be unconstitutional or otherwise invalid or unenforceable, the remainder of the section and the application of those provisions to other persons or circumstances shall not be affected thereby.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 536, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2000.   Note: In the 1999 Statutes, AB 55 was enacted as Ch. 533 and SB 189 was enacted as Ch. 542.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 2. SPECIAL RELATIONS OF DEBTOR AND CREDITOR [3429. - 3449.]



  TITLE 1. GENERAL PRINCIPLES [3429. - 3434.]

3429.

A debtor, within the meaning of this Title, is one who, by reason of an existing obligation, is or may become liable to pay money to another, whether such liability is certain or contingent.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

3430.

A creditor, within the meaning of this Title, is one in whose favor an obligation exists, by reason of which he is, or may become, entitled to the payment of money.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

3431.

In the absence of fraud, every contract of a debtor is valid against all his creditors, existing or subsequent, who have not acquired a lien on the property affected by such contract.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

3432.

A debtor may pay one creditor in preference to another, or may give to one creditor security for the payment of his demand in preference to another.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

3433.

Where a creditor is entitled to resort to each of several funds for the satisfaction of his claim, and another person has an interest in, or is entitled as a creditor to resort to some, but not all of them, the latter may require the former to seek satisfaction from those funds to which the latter has no such claim, so far as it can be done without impairing the right of the former to complete satisfaction, and without doing injustice to third persons.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

3434.

A lender who makes a loan of money, the proceeds of which are used or may be used by the borrower to finance the design, manufacture, construction, repair, modification or improvement of real or personal property for sale or lease to others, shall not be held liable to third persons for any loss or damage occasioned by any defect in the real or personal property so designed, manufactured, constructed, repaired, modified or improved or for any loss or damage resulting from the failure of the borrower to use due care in the design, manufacture, construction, repair, modification or improvement of such real or personal property, unless such loss or damage is a result of an act
 of the lender outside the scope of the activities of a lender of money or unless the lender has been a party to misrepresentations with respect to such real or personal property.

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 1584.)
-------------------------------------------



  TITLE 2. VOID AND VOIDABLE TRANSFERS AND UNDERTAKINGS [3439. - 3449.]



  CHAPTER 1. Uniform Voidable Transactions Act [3439. - 3439.14.]

3439.

This chapter may be cited as the Uniform Voidable Transactions Act.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 44, Sec. 3.   (SB 161)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

3439.01.

As used in this chapter the following definitions are applicable:

(a) “Asset” means property of a debtor, but the term does not include the following:

(1) Property to the extent it is encumbered by a valid lien.

(2) Property to
the extent it is generally exempt under nonbankruptcy law.

(3) An interest in property held in tenancy by the entireties to the extent it is not subject to process by a creditor holding a claim against only one tenant.

(b) “Claim,” except as used in “claim for relief,” means a right to payment, whether or not the right is reduced to judgment, liquidated, unliquidated, fixed, contingent, matured, unmatured, disputed, undisputed, legal, equitable, secured, or unsecured.

(c) “Creditor” means a person that has a claim, and includes an assignee of a general assignment for the benefit of creditors, as defined in Section 493.010 of the Code of Civil Procedure, of a debtor.

(d) “Debt” means liability on a claim.

(e) “Debtor” means a person that is liable on a claim.

(f) “Electronic” means relating to technology having electrical, digital, magnetic, wireless, optical, electromagnetic, or similar capabilities.

(g) “Lien” means a charge against or an interest in property to secure payment of a debt or performance of an obligation, and includes a security interest created by agreement, a judicial lien obtained by legal or equitable process or proceedings, a common-law lien, or a statutory lien.

(h) “Organization” means a person other than an individual.

(i) “Person” means an individual, partnership, corporation, limited liability company, association, government or governmental subdivision, instrumentality
or agency, business trust, estate, trust, business or nonprofit entity, or other legal entity.

(j) “Property” means anything that may be the subject of ownership.

(k) “Record” means information that is inscribed on a tangible medium or that is stored in an electronic or other medium and is retrievable in perceivable form.

(l) “Sign” means, with present intent to authenticate or adopt a record, to either (1) execute or adopt a tangible symbol, or (2) attach to or logically associate with the record an electronic symbol, sound, or process.

(m) “Transfer” means every mode, direct or indirect, absolute or conditional, voluntary or involuntary, of disposing of or parting with an asset or an interest in an asset, and includes payment of money, release, lease,
license, and creation of a lien or other encumbrance.

(n) “Valid lien” means a lien that is effective against the holder of a judicial lien subsequently obtained by legal or equitable process or proceedings.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 44, Sec. 4.   (SB 161)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

3439.02.

(a) A debtor is insolvent if, at a fair valuation, the sum of the debtor’s debts is greater than the sum of the debtor’s assets.

(b) A debtor that is generally not paying the debtor’s debts as they become due other than as a result of a bona fide dispute is presumed to be insolvent. The presumption imposes on the party against which the
presumption is directed the burden of proving that the nonexistence of insolvency is more probable than its existence.

(c) Assets under this section do not include property that has been transferred, concealed, or removed with intent to hinder, delay, or defraud creditors or that has been transferred in a manner making the transfer voidable under this chapter.

(d) Debts under this section do not include an obligation to the extent it is secured by a valid lien on property of the debtor not included as an asset.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 44, Sec. 5.   (SB 161)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

3439.03.

Value is given for a transfer or an obligation if, in exchange for the transfer or obligation, property is transferred or an antecedent debt is secured or satisfied, but value does not include an unperformed promise made otherwise than in the ordinary course of the promisor’s business to furnish support to the debtor or another person.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 383, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

3439.04.

(a) A transfer made or obligation incurred by a debtor is voidable as to a creditor, whether the creditor’s claim arose before or after the transfer was made or the obligation was incurred, if the debtor made the transfer or incurred the obligation as follows:

(1) With actual intent to hinder, delay, or defraud any creditor of the
debtor.

(2) Without receiving a reasonably equivalent value in exchange for the transfer or obligation, and the debtor either:

(A) Was engaged or was about to engage in a business or a transaction for which the remaining assets of the debtor were unreasonably small in relation to the business or transaction.

(B) Intended to incur, or believed or reasonably should have believed that the debtor would incur, debts beyond the debtor’s ability to pay as they became due.

(b) In determining actual intent under paragraph (1) of subdivision (a), consideration may be given, among other factors, to any or all of the following:

(1) Whether the transfer or obligation was to an insider.

(2) Whether the debtor retained possession or control of the property transferred after the transfer.

(3) Whether the transfer or obligation was disclosed or concealed.

(4) Whether before the transfer was made or obligation was incurred, the debtor had been sued or threatened with suit.

(5) Whether the transfer was of substantially all the debtor’s assets.

(6) Whether the debtor absconded.

(7) Whether the debtor removed or concealed assets.

(8) Whether the value of the consideration received by the debtor was reasonably equivalent to the value of the asset
transferred or the amount of the obligation incurred.

(9) Whether the debtor was insolvent or became insolvent shortly after the transfer was made or the obligation was incurred.

(10) Whether the transfer occurred shortly before or shortly after a substantial debt was incurred.

(11) Whether the debtor transferred the essential assets of the business to a lienor that transferred the assets to an insider of the debtor.

(c) A creditor making a claim for relief under subdivision (a) has the burden of proving the elements of the claim for relief by a preponderance of the evidence.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 44, Sec. 6.   (SB 161)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

3439.05.

(a) A transfer made or obligation incurred by a debtor is voidable as to a creditor whose claim arose before the transfer was made or the obligation was incurred if the debtor made the transfer or incurred the obligation without receiving a reasonably equivalent value in exchange for the transfer or obligation and the debtor was insolvent at that time or the debtor became insolvent as a result of the
transfer or obligation.

(b) A creditor making a claim for relief under subdivision (a) has the burden of proving the elements of the claim for relief by a preponderance of the evidence.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 44, Sec. 7.   (SB 161)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

3439.06.

For the purposes of this chapter:

(a) A transfer is made:

(1) With respect to an asset that is real property other than a fixture, but including the interest of a seller or purchaser under a contract for the sale of the asset, when the transfer is so far perfected that a good faith purchaser of
the asset from the debtor against which applicable law permits the transfer to be perfected cannot acquire an interest in the asset that is superior to the interest of the transferee; and

(2) With respect to an asset that is not real property or that is a fixture, when the transfer is so far perfected that a creditor on a simple contract cannot acquire a judicial lien otherwise than under this chapter that is superior to the interest of the transferee.

(b) If applicable law permits the transfer to be perfected as provided in subdivision (a) and the transfer is not so perfected before the commencement of an action for relief under this chapter, the transfer is deemed made immediately before the commencement of the action.

(c) If applicable law does not permit the transfer to be perfected as provided in subdivision
(a), the transfer is made when it becomes effective between the debtor and the transferee.

(d) A transfer is not made until the debtor has acquired rights in the asset transferred.

(e) An obligation is incurred:

(1) If oral, when it becomes effective between the parties; or

(2) If evidenced by a record, when the record signed by the obligor is delivered to or for the benefit of the obligee.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 44, Sec. 8.   (SB 161)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

3439.07.

(a) In an action for relief against a transfer or obligation under this chapter, a creditor, subject to the limitations in Section 3439.08, may obtain:

(1) Avoidance of the transfer or obligation to the extent necessary to satisfy the creditor’s claim.

(2) An attachment or
other provisional remedy against the asset transferred or other property of the transferee in accordance with the procedures described in Title 6.5 (commencing with Section 481.010) of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure, or as may otherwise be available under applicable law.

(3) Subject to applicable principles of equity and in accordance with applicable rules of civil procedure, the following:

(A) An injunction against further disposition by the debtor or a transferee, or both, of the asset transferred or other property of the transferee.

(B) Appointment of a receiver to take charge of the asset transferred or other property of the transferee.

(C) Any other relief the circumstances may require.

(b) If a creditor has commenced an action on a claim against the debtor, the creditor may attach the asset transferred or other property of the transferee if the remedy of attachment is available in the action under applicable law and the property is subject to attachment in the hands of the transferee under applicable law.

(c) If a creditor has obtained a judgment on a claim against the debtor, the creditor may levy execution on the asset transferred or its proceeds.

(d) A creditor who is an assignee of a general assignment for the benefit of creditors, as defined in Section 493.010 of the Code of Civil Procedure, may exercise any and all of the rights and remedies specified in this section if they are available to any one or more creditors of the assignor who are beneficiaries of the assignment, and, in that event (1) only to the extent the rights or remedies are so
available and (2) only for the benefit of those creditors whose rights are asserted by the assignee.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 44, Sec. 9.   (SB 161)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

3439.08.

(a) A transfer or obligation is not voidable under paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 3439.04, against a person that took in good faith and for a reasonably equivalent value given the debtor or against any subsequent transferee or obligee.

(b) To the extent a transfer is avoidable in an action by a creditor under paragraph (1)
of subdivision (a) of Section 3439.07, the following rules apply:

(1) Except as otherwise provided in this section, the creditor may recover judgment for the value of the asset transferred, as adjusted under subdivision (c), or the amount necessary to satisfy the creditor’s claim, whichever is less. The judgment may be entered against the following:

(A) The first transferee of the asset or the person for whose benefit the transfer was made.

(B) An immediate or mediate transferee of the first transferee, other than either of the following:

(i) A good faith transferee that took for value.

(ii) An immediate or mediate good faith transferee of a person described in clause (i).

(2) Recovery pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a), or subdivision (b), or subdivision (c) of Section 3439.07 of or from the asset transferred or its proceeds, or other property of the transferee, as applicable, by levy or otherwise, is available only against a person described in subparagraph (A) or (B) of paragraph (1).

(c) If the judgment under subdivision (b) is based upon the value of the asset transferred, the judgment shall be for an amount equal to the value of the asset at the time of the transfer, subject to adjustment as the equities may require.

(d) Notwithstanding voidability of a transfer or an obligation under this chapter, a good faith transferee or obligee is entitled, to the extent of the value given the debtor for the transfer or obligation, to the following:

(1) A lien on or a right to retain an interest in the asset transferred.

(2) Enforcement of an obligation incurred.

(3) A reduction in the amount of the liability on the judgment.

(e) A transfer is not voidable under paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 3439.04 or Section 3439.05 if the transfer results from either of the following:

(1) Termination of a lease upon default by the debtor when the termination is pursuant to the lease and applicable law.

(2) Enforcement of a lien in a noncollusive manner and in compliance with applicable law, including Division 9 (commencing with Section 9101) of the Commercial Code, other
than a retention of collateral under Sections 9620 and 9621 of the Commercial Code and other than a voluntary transfer of the collateral by the debtor to the lienor in satisfaction of all or part of the secured obligation.

(f) The following rules determine the burden of proving matters referred to in this section:

(1) A party that seeks to invoke subdivision (a), (d), or (e) has the burden of proving the applicability of that subdivision.

(2) Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (3) or (4), the creditor has the burden of proving each applicable element of subdivision (b) or (c).

(3) The transferee has the burden of proving the applicability to the transferee of subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (b).

(4) A party that seeks adjustment under subdivision (c) has the burden of proving the adjustment.

(g) The standard of proof required to establish matters referred to in this section is preponderance of the evidence.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 44, Sec. 10.   (SB 161)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

3439.09.

A cause of action with respect to a transfer or obligation under this chapter is extinguished unless action is brought pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 3439.07 or levy made as provided in subdivision (b) or (c) of Section 3439.07:

(a) Under paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 3439.04, not later than four years after the transfer was made or
the obligation was incurred or, if later, not later than one year after the transfer or obligation was or could reasonably have been discovered by the claimant.

(b) Under paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 3439.04 or Section 3439.05, not later than four years after the transfer was made or the obligation was incurred.

(c) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a cause of action under this chapter with respect to a transfer or obligation is extinguished if no action is brought or levy made within seven years after the transfer was made or the obligation was incurred.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 44, Sec. 11.   (SB 161)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

3439.10.

(a) In this section, the following rules determine a debtor’s location:

(1) A debtor who is an individual is located at the individual’s principal residence.

(2) A debtor that is an organization and has only one place of business is located at its place of business.

(3) A debtor that is an organization and has more than one place of business is located at its chief executive office.

(b) A claim in the nature of a claim under this chapter is governed by the local law of the jurisdiction in which the debtor is located when the transfer is made or the obligation is incurred.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 44, Sec. 13.   (SB 161)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

3439.12.

Unless displaced by the provisions of this chapter, the principles of law and equity, including the law merchant and the law relating to principal and agent, estoppel, laches, fraud, misrepresentation, duress, coercion, mistake, insolvency, or other validating or invalidating cause, supplement its provisions.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 3439.10 by Stats. 2015, Ch. 44, Sec. 12.   (SB 161)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

3439.13.

This chapter shall be applied and construed to effectuate its general purpose to make uniform the law with respect to the subject of this chapter among states enacting it.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 3439.11 by Stats. 2015, Ch. 44, Sec. 14.   (SB 161)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

3439.14.

(a) The changes to this chapter made by the act adding this subdivision apply only to a right of action that accrued, transfer made, or obligation incurred, on or after the effective date of that act.

(b) This chapter, and the other changes in the law made by Chapter 383 of the Statutes of 1986, apply only to transfers made or obligations incurred before the effective date of the
act that added subdivision (a) and on or after January 1, 1987. As to transfers made or obligations incurred prior to January 1, 1987, the law in effect at the time the transfer was made or the obligation was incurred shall apply.

(c) Section 3439.06 shall determine the date that a transfer was made or obligation incurred.

(d) The provisions of this chapter, insofar as they are substantially the same as the provisions of this chapter in effect on December 31, 2015, shall be construed as restatements and continuations, and not as new enactments.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 3439.12 by Stats. 2015, Ch. 44, Sec. 15.   (SB 161)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Conveyance of Personal Property Without Delivery [3440. - 3440.9.]

3440.

(a) Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, every transfer of personal property made by a person having at the time the possession of the property, and not accompanied by an immediate delivery followed by an actual and continued change of possession of the property, is void as against the transferor’s creditors (secured or unsecured) at the time of the transfer and those who become creditors while the transferor remains in possession and the successors in interest of those creditors, and as against buyers from the transferor for value in good faith subsequent to the transfer.

(b) As used in this chapter, “creditor” means a person who has a claim, as defined in Section 3439.01, and includes an assignee of a general assignment for the benefit of creditors, as defined in Section 493.010 of the Code of Civil Procedure, of a debtor. “Creditor” also includes any person to whom the transferor’s estate devolves in trust for the benefit of persons other than the transferor. Any such assignee or trustee may exercise any and all the rights and remedies specified in this chapter, if they are available to any one or more creditors of the assignor or transferor who are beneficiaries of the assignment or trust, and, in that event (1) only to the extent the rights or remedies are so available and (2) only for the benefit of those creditors whose rights are asserted by the assignee or trustee.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 40, Sec. 3.   Effective June 8, 1987.)
-------------------------------------------

3440.1.

This chapter does not apply to any of the following:

(a) Things in action.

(b) Ships or cargoes if either are at sea or in a foreign port.

(c) The sale of accounts, chattel paper, payment intangibles, or promissory notes governed
by the Uniform Commercial Code, security interests, and contracts of bottomry or respondentia.

(d) Wines or brandies in the wineries, distilleries, or wine cellars of the makers or owners of the wines or brandies, or other persons having possession, care, and control of the wines or brandies, and the pipes, casks, and tanks in which the wines or brandies are contained, if the transfers are made in writing and executed and acknowledged, and if the transfers are recorded in the book of official records in the office of the county recorder of the county in which the wines, brandies, pipes, casks, and tanks are situated.

(e) A transfer or assignment made for the benefit of creditors generally or by an assignee acting under an assignment for the benefit of creditors generally.

(f) Property exempt from enforcement of a
money judgment.

(g) Standing timber.

(h) Subject to the limitations in Section 3440.3, a transfer of personal property if all of the following conditions are satisfied:

(1) Before the date of the intended transfer, the transferor or the transferee files a financing statement, with respect to the property transferred, authorized in an authenticated record by the transferor. The financing statement shall be filed in the office of the Secretary of State in accordance with Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 9501) of Division 9 of the Commercial Code, but may use the terms “transferor” in lieu of “debtor” and “transferee” in lieu of “secured party.” The provisions of Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 9501) of Division 9 of the Commercial Code shall apply as appropriate to the financing statement.

(2) The transferor or the transferee publishes a notice of the intended transfer one time in a newspaper of general circulation published in the public notice district in which the personal property is located, if there is one, and if there is none in the public notice district, then in a newspaper of general circulation in the county in which the personal property is located. The publication shall be completed not less than 10 days before the date the transfer occurs. The notice shall contain the name and address of the transferor and transferee and a general statement of the character of the personal property intended to be transferred, and shall indicate the place where the personal property is located and a date on or after which the transfer is to be made.

(i) Personal property not located within this state at the time of the transfer or attachment of the lien if the provisions
of this subdivision are not used for the purpose of evading this chapter.

(j) A transfer of property that (1) is subject to a statute or treaty of the United States or a statute of this state that provides for the registration of transfers of title or issuance of certificates of title and (2) is so far perfected under that statute or treaty that a bona fide purchaser cannot acquire an interest in the property transferred that is superior to the interest of the transferee.

(k) A transfer of personal property in connection with a transaction in which the property is immediately thereafter leased by the transferor from the transferee provided the transferee purchased the property for value and in good faith pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 10308 of the Commercial Code.

(l) Water supply property, as defined
in Section 849 of the Public Utilities Code.

(m) A transfer of property by any governmental entity.

(n) For the purposes of this section, publication of notice in a public notice district is governed by Chapter 1.1 (commencing with Section 6080) of Division 7 of Title 1 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 703, Sec. 4.   (AB 2881)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

3440.2.

Subject to Section 3440.3, a transfer of personal property shall not be void under Section 3440 as against a creditor of the transferor or as against a buyer from the transferor, if the creditor’s or buyer’s claim or right against the transferor arises after the date all of the requirements of subdivision (h) of Section 3440.1 have been met, other than the requirement that filing of the financing statement and publication of the notice referred to therein be completed prior to the transfer.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1368, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

3440.3.

A transfer of personal property, as to which the conditions set forth in subdivision (h) of Section 3440.1, Section 3440.2, or subdivision (b) of Section 3440.5 are satisfied, shall, nevertheless, be void under Section 3440 as against a person who has purchased the personal property from the transferor and who is a “buyer in the ordinary course of business,” as defined in paragraph (9) of subdivision (b) of Section 1201 of the Commercial Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 254, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

3440.4.

This chapter does not affect the rights of a buyer for value in good faith who purchases the transferred personal property from the transferee or from a successor in interest of the transferee, provided the transferor is no longer in possession of the personal property at the time of the purchase by that buyer.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1368, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

3440.5.

(a) This chapter does not affect the rights of a secured party who, for value and in good faith, acquires a security interest in the transferred personal property from the transferee, or from the transferee’s successor in interest, if the transferor is no longer in possession of the personal property at the time the security interest attaches.

(b) Additionally, except as provided in Section 3440.3, this chapter does not affect the rights of a secured party who acquires a security interest from the transferee, or from the transferee’s successor in interest, in the personal property, if all of the following conditions are satisfied:

(1) On or before the date the security agreement is executed, the intended debtor or secured party files a financing statement with respect to the property transferred, signed by the intended debtor. The financing statement shall be filed in the office of the Secretary of State in accordance with Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 9501) of Division 9 of the Commercial Code, but shall use the terms “transferor” in lieu of “debtor,” “transferee” in lieu of “secured party,” and “secured party” in lieu of “assignee of secured party.” The provisions of Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 9501) of Division
9 of the Commercial Code shall apply as appropriate to the financing statement. For the purpose of indexing, and in any certification of search, the Secretary of State may refer to any financing statement filed pursuant to this paragraph as a financing statement under the Commercial Code and may describe the transferor as a debtor and the transferee as a secured party.

(2) The intended debtor or secured party publishes a notice of the transfer one time in a newspaper of general circulation published in the public notice district in which the personal property is located, if there is one, and if there is none in the public notice district, then in a newspaper of general circulation in the county in which the personal property is located. The publication shall be completed not less than 10 days before the date of execution by the intended debtor of the intended security agreement. The notice shall contain the names and addresses of the transferor
and transferee and of the intended debtor and secured party, a general statement of the character of the personal property transferred and intended to be subject to the security interest, the location of the personal property, and the date on or after which the security agreement is to be executed by the intended debtor.

(c) Compliance with paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) shall not perfect the security interest of the secured party. Perfection of that security interest shall be governed by Division 9 (commencing with Section 9101) of the Commercial Code.

(d) For the purposes of this section, publication of notice in a public notice district is governed by Chapter 1.1 (commencing with Section 6080) of Division 7 of Title 1 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 703, Sec. 5.   (AB 2881)   Effective January 1, 2017.   Note: Amendment by Stats. 1999, Ch. 991, is operative July 1, 2001, by Sec. 75 of Ch. 991.)
-------------------------------------------

3440.6.

No action shall be brought or levy made under this chapter more than one year after the earliest of the following dates:

(a) The date the person bringing the action or making the levy should have discovered the transfer in the exercise of reasonable diligence.

(b) The date the person bringing the action or making the levy obtained actual knowledge of the transfer.

(c) The date the delivery of, and actual and continued change of possession of, the property
transferred occurred.

(d) If the financing statement filed pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 3440.1 has not lapsed, the date the filing and publication requirements of subdivision (h) of Section 3440.1 were met, other than the requirement that the filing of the financing statement and publication of the notice referred to therein be completed prior to the transfer.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1368, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

3440.9.

Subdivision (2) of Section 2402 and subdivision (a) of Section 10308 of the Commercial Code are not restricted by the provisions of this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 668, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Undertaking in Voidable Transfer Action [3445. - 3449.]

3445.

As used in this chapter:

(a) “Transfer” means “transfer” as defined in Section 3439.01.

(b) “Creditor” means “creditor” as defined in Section 3439.01.

(c) “Transferee” means the person to whom property was transferred or an obligation was incurred, or the successors or assigns of the person.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 383, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

3446.

(a) In an action by a creditor for relief against a transfer or obligation under Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 3439) of Title 2 of Part 2 of Division 4 on the ground that the transfer or obligation is voidable as to the creditor, the transferee may give an undertaking as provided in this chapter.

(b) If an undertaking is given as
provided in this chapter, the transferee may sell, encumber, transfer, convey, mortgage, pledge, or otherwise dispose of the property or obligation, or a part thereof, and the purchaser, encumbrancer, transferee, mortgagee, grantee, or pledgee of the property or obligation takes, owns, holds, and possesses the property or obligation unaffected by the action and any judgment that is rendered in the action.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 44, Sec. 17.   (SB 161)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

3447.

The undertaking shall be conditioned that, if it is determined in the action that the transfer or obligation was voidable as to the creditor, the transferee will pay to the creditor the lesser of the following amounts:

(a) The value of the property or obligation as estimated in the undertaking.

(b) The amount determined in the action to be due and owing to the creditor by the person who transferred the property or incurred the obligation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 44, Sec. 18.   (SB 161)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

3448.

The undertaking shall be in the lesser of the following amounts:

(a) Double the value of the property or obligation.

(b) Double the amount of the creditor’s claim in the action.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 517, Sec. 93.)
-------------------------------------------

3449.

The undertaking becomes effective 10 days after service of the undertaking on the creditor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 517, Sec. 93.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 3. NUISANCE [3479. - 3508.2.]



  TITLE 1. GENERAL PRINCIPLES [3479. - 3486.]

3479.

Anything which is injurious to health, including, but not limited to, the illegal sale of controlled substances, or is indecent or offensive to the senses, or an obstruction to the free use of property, so as to interfere with the comfortable enjoyment of life or property, or unlawfully obstructs the free passage or use, in the customary manner, of any navigable lake, or river, bay, stream, canal, or basin, or any public park, square, street, or highway, is a nuisance.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 658, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

[3480.]

A public nuisance is one which affects at the same time an entire community or neighborhood, or any considerable number of persons, although the extent of the annoyance or damage inflicted upon individuals may be unequal.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 67, Sec. 36.   (AB 1170)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

3481.

Every nuisance not included in the definition of the last section is private.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

3482.

Nothing which is done or maintained under the express authority of a statute can be deemed a nuisance.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

3482.1.

(a) As used in this section:

(1) “Person” means an individual, proprietorship, partnership, corporation, club, or other legal entity.

(2) “Sport shooting range” or “range” means an area designed and operated for the use of rifles, shotguns, pistols, silhouettes, skeet, trap, black powder, or any other similar sport or law enforcement training purpose.

(3) “Indoor shooting range” means a totally enclosed facility designed to offer a totally controlled shooting environment that includes impenetrable walls, floor and ceiling, adequate ventilation and lighting systems, and acoustical treatment for sound attenuation suitable for the range’s approved use.

(4) “Nighttime” means between the hours of 10 p.m. and 7 a.m.

(b) (1) Except as provided in subdivision (f), a person who operates or uses a sport shooting range in this state shall not be subject to civil liability or criminal prosecution in any matter relating to noise or noise pollution resulting from the operation or use of the range if the range is in compliance with any noise control laws or ordinances that applied to the range and its operation at the time construction or operation of the range was approved by a local public entity having
 jurisdiction in the matter, or if there were no such laws or ordinances that applied to the range and its operation at that time.
